Hawaii statutes.
[§329-125.6] Protections afforded to an
owner or qualified employee of a licensed medical marijuana dispensary.
(a) An owner or employee of a medical marijuana dispensary that is licensed
under chapter 329D may assert the production or distribution of medical
marijuana as an affirmative defense to any prosecution involving marijuana
under this part, chapter 329D, or chapter 712; provided that the owner or
employee strictly complied with the requirements of chapter 329D and any
administrative rules adopted thereunder.

(b) An owner or employee of a licensed medical
marijuana dispensary not strictly complying with the requirements of chapter
329D, and any administrative rules adopted thereunder, shall not be afforded
the protections provided by subsection (a). [L 2015, c 241, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next